Hawaii statutes.
[§11-429] Minimum qualifying
contribution amounts; qualifying contribution statement. (a) As a
condition of receiving public funds for a primary or general election, a
candidate shall not be unopposed in any election for which public funds are
sought, shall have filed an affidavit with the commission pursuant to section
11-423 to voluntarily limit the candidate's campaign expenditures, and shall be
in receipt of the following sum of qualifying contributions from individual
residents of Hawaii:

(1) For the office of governor — qualifying contributions
that in the aggregate exceed $100,000;

(2) For the office of lieutenant governor —
qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed $50,000;

(3) For the office of mayor for each respective
county:

(A) County of Honolulu — qualifying contributions
that in the aggregate exceed $50,000;

(B) County of Hawaii — qualifying contributions
that in the aggregate exceed $15,000;

(C) County of Maui — qualifying contributions
that in the aggregate exceed $10,000; and

(D) County of Kauai — qualifying contributions
that in the aggregate exceed $5,000;

(4) For the office of prosecuting attorney for each
respective county:

(A) County of Honolulu — qualifying contributions
that in the aggregate exceed $30,000;

(B) County of Hawaii — qualifying contributions
that in the aggregate exceed $10,000; and

(C) County of Kauai — qualifying contributions
that in the aggregate exceed $5,000;

(5) For the office of county council — for each
respective county:

(A) County of Honolulu — qualifying contributions
that in the aggregate exceed $5,000;

(B) County of Hawaii — qualifying contributions
that in the aggregate exceed $1,500;

(C) County of Maui — qualifying contributions
that in the aggregate exceed $5,000; and

(D) County of Kauai — qualifying contributions
that in the aggregate exceed $3,000;

(6) For the office of state senator — qualifying
contributions that, in the aggregate exceed $2,500;

(7) For the office of state representative —
qualifying contributions that, in the aggregate, exceed $1,500;

(8) For the office of Hawaiian affairs — qualifying
contributions that, in the aggregate, exceed $1,500; and

(9) For all other offices, qualifying contributions
that, in the aggregate, exceed $500.

(b) A candidate shall obtain the minimum
qualifying contribution amount set forth in subsection (a) once for the
election period.

(1) If the candidate obtains the minimum qualifying
contribution amount, the candidate is eligible to receive:

(A) The minimum payment in an amount equal to
the minimum qualifying contribution amounts; and

(B) Payments of $1 for each $1 of qualifying
contributions in excess of the minimum qualifying contribution amounts; and

(2) A candidate shall have at least one other
qualified candidate as an opponent for the primary or general election to
receive public funds for that election.

(c) The candidate shall not receive more than
the maximum amount of public funds available to a candidate pursuant to section
11-425; provided that the candidate shall not receive public funds for a
primary election if the candidate does not obtain the minimum qualifying
contribution amounts before the date of the primary election. [L 2010, c 211,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next